Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin UNDERREPRESENTED GROUPS CULTURAL STUDIES MATERIALS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for competitive grants to develop high-quality academic cultural and ethnic studies materials for communities that do not have adequate cultural and ethnic studies materials or who are underrepresented in those materials, including but not limited to the Hmong, Karen, Somali, and Oromo cultures and cultures without a formal writing system that are largely oral-based. In developing these materials, a recipient of a grant under this section must work with school districts that intend to use the materials. new text end